Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.640

Publication and distribution of list of licensed warehouses.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW, the department shall publish annually and distribute to interested parties, a list of licensed warehouses showing the location, county, capacity, and bond coverage for each company.

[ 2005 c 274 s 240; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 25.]